data/source/lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Neut
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Nom_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Voc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Gerund_Past
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:none
AM is:Super_short_rare
AM is:rare
AM is:Super_long
AM is:short

SFX 1 Y 4
SFX 1 as as . 38
SFX 1 as o . 39
SFX 1 ai ai . 40
SFX 1 ai ų . 41

SFX 3 Y 10
SFX 3 as ui . 42
SFX 3 as ą . 43
SFX 3 as u . 44
SFX 3 as e . 45
SFX 3 ai ams . 46
SFX 3 ai am . 47
SFX 3 ai us . 48
SFX 3 ai ais . 49
SFX 3 ai uose . 50
SFX 3 ai uos . 51

SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 as e . 52

SFX 8 Y 3
SFX 8 ukas uk . 52
SFX 8 okas oke . 52
SFX 8 okas ok . 53

SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 as ai . 52

SFX 12 Y 2
SFX 12 as an . 54
SFX 12 ai uosna . 55

SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 as u . 56

SFX 14 Y 2
SFX 14 as ai . 40
SFX 14 as ų . 41

SFX 16 Y 6
SFX 16 as ams . 46
SFX 16 as am . 47
SFX 16 as us . 48
SFX 16 as ais . 49
SFX 16 as uose . 50
SFX 16 as uos . 51

SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 as ai . 57

SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 as uosna . 55

SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 ai ai . 57

SFX 34 Y 2
SFX 34 ai as . 58
SFX 34 ai o . 59

SFX 36 Y 4
SFX 36 ai ui . 60
SFX 36 ai ą . 61
SFX 36 ai u . 62
SFX 36 ai e . 63

SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 ai e . 64

SFX 41 Y 3
SFX 41 ukai uk . 64
SFX 41 okai oke . 64
SFX 41 okai ok . 65

SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 ai an . 66

SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 ai u . 67

SFX 46 Y 4
SFX 46 as as . 68
SFX 46 as o . 69
SFX 46 ai ai . 70
SFX 46 ai ų . 71

SFX 48 Y 10
SFX 48 as ui . 72
SFX 48 as ą . 73
SFX 48 as u . 74
SFX 48 as e . 75
SFX 48 ai ams . 76
SFX 48 ai am . 77
SFX 48 ai us . 78
SFX 48 ai ais . 79
SFX 48 ai uose . 80
SFX 48 ai uos . 81

SFX 52 Y 2
SFX 52 as e . 82
SFX 52 ai ai . 83

SFX 53 Y 2
SFX 53 as an . 84
SFX 53 ai uosna . 85

SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 as u . 86

SFX 55 Y 2
SFX 55 as ai . 70
SFX 55 as ų . 71

SFX 57 Y 6
SFX 57 as ams . 76
SFX 57 as am . 77
SFX 57 as us . 78
SFX 57 as ais . 79
SFX 57 as uose . 80
SFX 57 as uos . 81

SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 as ai . 83

SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 as uosna . 85

SFX 75 Y 2
SFX 75 ai ai . 40
SFX 75 ai ų . 41

SFX 77 Y 6
SFX 77 ai ams . 46
SFX 77 ai am . 47
SFX 77 ai us . 48
SFX 77 ai ais . 49
SFX 77 ai uose . 50
SFX 77 ai uos . 51

SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 ai ai . 57

SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 ai uosna . 55

SFX 85 Y 4
SFX 85 as as . 38
SFX 85 as o . 39
SFX 85 ai ai . 40
SFX 85 ai ų . 41

SFX 87 Y 16
SFX 87 as ui . 42
SFX 87 as ą . 43
SFX 87 as u . 44
SFX 87 ias yje [^č]ias 45
SFX 87 čias tyje čias 45
SFX 87 ias y [^č]ias 87
SFX 87 ias yj [^č]ias 88
SFX 87 čias ty čias 87
SFX 87 as uje jas 45
SFX 87 as uj jas 87
SFX 87 ai ams . 46
SFX 87 ai am . 47
SFX 87 ai us . 48
SFX 87 ai ais . 49
SFX 87 ai uose . 50
SFX 87 ai uos . 51

SFX 96 Y 2
SFX 96 as yje jas 45
SFX 96 as y jas 87

SFX 99 Y 4
SFX 99 as au jas 52
SFX 99 as y [^č]ias 52
SFX 99 čias ty [^š]čias 52
SFX 99 čias ti ščias 52

SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 ias i . 52

SFX 104 Y 3
SFX 104 ias ie . 52
SFX 104 ias iau . 52
SFX 104 ias ie . 52

SFX 107 Y 3
SFX 107 as an . 54
SFX 107 as uosna . 55
SFX 107 ai uosna . 55

SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 as in jas 54

SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 ias in . 54

SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 ias in . 54

SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 as u . 56

SFX 112 Y 2
SFX 112 as ai . 40
SFX 112 as ų . 41

SFX 114 Y 6
SFX 114 as ams . 46
SFX 114 as am . 47
SFX 114 as us . 48
SFX 114 as ais . 49
SFX 114 as uose . 50
SFX 114 as uos . 51

SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 as ai . 57

SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 ai ai . 57

SFX 132 Y 2
SFX 132 ai as . 58
SFX 132 ai o . 59

SFX 134 Y 9
SFX 134 ai ui . 60
SFX 134 ai ą . 61
SFX 134 ai u . 62
SFX 134 iai yje [^č]iai 63
SFX 134 čiai tyje čiai 63
SFX 134 iai y [^č]iai 88
SFX 134 čiai ty čiai 88
SFX 134 ai uje jai 63
SFX 134 ai uj jai 88

SFX 143 Y 4
SFX 143 ai au jai 64
SFX 143 ai y [^č]iai 64
SFX 143 čiai ty [^š]čiai 64
SFX 143 čiai ti ščiai 64

SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 ai an . 66

SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 ai u . 67

SFX 149 Y 6
SFX 149 is is . 38
SFX 149 ys ys . 38
SFX 149 is io . 39
SFX 149 ys io . 39
SFX 149 ai ai . 40
SFX 149 ai ų . 41

SFX 153 Y 16
SFX 153 is iui . 42
SFX 153 ys iui . 42
SFX 153 is į . 43
SFX 153 ys į . 43
SFX 153 is iu . 44
SFX 153 ys iu . 44
SFX 153 is yje . 45
SFX 153 ys yje . 45
SFX 153 is y . 87
SFX 153 ys y . 87
SFX 153 ai ams . 46
SFX 153 ai am . 47
SFX 153 ai us . 48
SFX 153 ai ais . 49
SFX 153 ai uose . 50
SFX 153 ai uos . 51

SFX 163 Y 5
SFX 163 is i . 52
SFX 163 ys y . 52
SFX 163 is au brolis 52
SFX 163 is iau dievulėlis 52
SFX 163 ai ai . 57

SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 is 0 . 53

SFX 168 Y 3
SFX 168 is in . 54
SFX 168 ys in . 54
SFX 168 ai uosna . 55

SFX 170 Y 2
SFX 170 is iu . 56
SFX 170 ys iu . 56

SFX 172 Y 4
SFX 172 is iai . 40
SFX 172 ys iai . 40
SFX 172 is ių . 41
SFX 172 ys ių . 41

SFX 176 Y 12
SFX 176 is iams . 46
SFX 176 ys iams . 46
SFX 176 is iam . 47
SFX 176 ys iam . 47
SFX 176 is ius . 48
SFX 176 ys ius . 48
SFX 176 is iais . 49
SFX 176 ys iais . 49
SFX 176 is iuose . 50
SFX 176 ys iuose . 50
SFX 176 is iuos . 51
SFX 176 ys iuos . 51

SFX 188 Y 2
SFX 188 is iai . 57
SFX 188 ys iai . 57

SFX 190 Y 2
SFX 190 is iuosna . 55
SFX 190 ys iuosna . 55

SFX 202 Y 4
SFX 202 is is . 38
SFX 202 is io . 39
SFX 202 ai ai . 40
SFX 202 ai ų . 41

SFX 204 Y 11
SFX 204 is iui . 42
SFX 204 is į . 43
SFX 204 is iu . 44
SFX 204 is yje . 45
SFX 204 is y . 87
SFX 204 ai ams . 46
SFX 204 ai am . 47
SFX 204 ai us . 48
SFX 204 ai ais . 49
SFX 204 ai uose . 50
SFX 204 ai uos . 51

SFX 209 Y 4
SFX 209 is i . 52
SFX 209 is au brolis 52
SFX 209 is iau dievulėlis 52
SFX 209 ai ai . 57

SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 is 0 . 53

SFX 213 Y 2
SFX 213 is in . 54
SFX 213 ai uosna . 55

SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 is iu . 56

SFX 215 Y 2
SFX 215 is iai . 40
SFX 215 is ių . 41

SFX 217 Y 6
SFX 217 is iams . 46
SFX 217 is iam . 47
SFX 217 is ius . 48
SFX 217 is iais . 49
SFX 217 is iuose . 50
SFX 217 is iuos . 51

SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 is iai . 57

SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 is iuosna . 55

SFX 235 Y 2
SFX 235 iai is . 58
SFX 235 iai io . 59

SFX 237 Y 5
SFX 237 iai iui . 60
SFX 237 iai į . 61
SFX 237 iai iu . 62
SFX 237 iai yje . 63
SFX 237 iai y . 88

SFX 242 Y 3
SFX 242 iai i . 64
SFX 242 iai au broliai 64
SFX 242 iai iau dievulėliai 64

SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 iai 0 . 65

SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 iai in . 66

SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 iai iu . 67

SFX 248 Y 4
SFX 248 ys ys . 38
SFX 248 ys io . 39
SFX 248 ai ai . 40
SFX 248 ai ų . 41

SFX 250 Y 11
SFX 250 ys iui . 42
SFX 250 ys į . 43
SFX 250 ys iu . 44
SFX 250 ys yje . 45
SFX 250 ys y . 87
SFX 250 ai ams . 46
SFX 250 ai am . 47
SFX 250 ai us . 48
SFX 250 ai ais . 49
SFX 250 ai uose . 50
SFX 250 ai uos . 51

SFX 255 Y 2
SFX 255 ys y . 52
SFX 255 ai ai . 57

SFX 256 Y 2
SFX 256 ys in . 54
SFX 256 ai uosna . 55

SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 ys iu . 56

SFX 258 Y 2
SFX 258 ys iai . 40
SFX 258 ys ių . 41

SFX 260 Y 6
SFX 260 ys iams . 46
SFX 260 ys iam . 47
SFX 260 ys ius . 48
SFX 260 ys iais . 49
SFX 260 ys iuose . 50
SFX 260 ys iuos . 51

SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 ys iai . 57

SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 ys iuosna . 55

SFX 278 Y 2
SFX 278 iai ys . 58
SFX 278 iai io . 59

SFX 280 Y 5
SFX 280 iai iui . 60
SFX 280 iai į . 61
SFX 280 iai iu . 62
SFX 280 iai yje . 63
SFX 280 iai y . 88

SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 iai y . 64

SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 iai in . 66

SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 iai iu . 67

SFX 288 Y 4
SFX 288 is is . 68
SFX 288 ys ys . 68
SFX 288 is io . 69
SFX 288 ys io . 69

SFX 292 Y 10
SFX 292 is iui . 72
SFX 292 ys iui . 72
SFX 292 is į . 73
SFX 292 ys į . 73
SFX 292 is iu . 74
SFX 292 ys iu . 74
SFX 292 is yje . 75
SFX 292 ys yje . 75
SFX 292 is y . 89
SFX 292 ys y . 89

SFX 302 Y 3
SFX 302 is i . 82
SFX 302 ys y . 82
SFX 302 is au brolis 82

SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 is 0 . 90

SFX 306 Y 2
SFX 306 is in . 84
SFX 306 ys in . 84

SFX 308 Y 2
SFX 308 is iu . 86
SFX 308 ys iu . 86

SFX 310 Y 4
SFX 310 is iai . 70
SFX 310 ys iai . 70
SFX 310 is ių . 71
SFX 310 ys ių . 71

SFX 314 Y 12
SFX 314 is iams . 76
SFX 314 ys iams . 76
SFX 314 is iam . 77
SFX 314 ys iam . 77
SFX 314 is ius . 78
SFX 314 ys ius . 78
SFX 314 is iais . 79
SFX 314 ys iais . 79
SFX 314 is iuose . 80
SFX 314 ys iuose . 80
SFX 314 is iuos . 81
SFX 314 ys iuos . 81

SFX 326 Y 2
SFX 326 is iai . 83
SFX 326 ys iai . 83

SFX 328 Y 2
SFX 328 is iuosna . 85
SFX 328 ys iuosna . 85

SFX 330 Y 7
SFX 330 is is . 38
SFX 330 ys ys . 38
SFX 330 ys as žvejys 38
SFX 330 is o . 39
SFX 330 ys o . 39
SFX 330 ai ai . 40
SFX 330 ai ų . 41

SFX 335 Y 16
SFX 335 is ui . 42
SFX 335 ys ui . 42
SFX 335 is į . 43
SFX 335 ys į . 43
SFX 335 is u . 44
SFX 335 ys u . 44
SFX 335 is yje . 45
SFX 335 ys yje . 45
SFX 335 is y . 87
SFX 335 ys y . 87
SFX 335 ai ams . 46
SFX 335 ai am . 47
SFX 335 ai us . 48
SFX 335 ai ais . 49
SFX 335 ai uose . 50
SFX 335 ai uos . 51

SFX 345 Y 3
SFX 345 is i . 52
SFX 345 ys y . 52
SFX 345 ai ai . 57

SFX 347 Y 3
SFX 347 is in . 54
SFX 347 ys in . 54
SFX 347 ai uosna . 55

SFX 349 Y 2
SFX 349 is u . 56
SFX 349 ys u . 56

SFX 351 Y 4
SFX 351 is ai . 40
SFX 351 ys ai . 40
SFX 351 is ų . 41
SFX 351 ys ų . 41

SFX 355 Y 12
SFX 355 is ams . 46
SFX 355 ys ams . 46
SFX 355 is am . 47
SFX 355 ys am . 47
SFX 355 is us . 48
SFX 355 ys us . 48
SFX 355 is ais . 49
SFX 355 ys ais . 49
SFX 355 is uose . 50
SFX 355 ys uose . 50
SFX 355 is uos . 51
SFX 355 ys iuos . 51

SFX 367 Y 2
SFX 367 is ai . 57
SFX 367 ys ai . 57

SFX 369 Y 2
SFX 369 is uosna . 55
SFX 369 ys uosna . 55

SFX 381 Y 4
SFX 381 is is . 38
SFX 381 is o . 39
SFX 381 ai ai . 40
SFX 381 ai ų . 41
